Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.224

Licensing exemptions—Residential mortgage loans.

The following are exempt from licensing as mortgage loan originators under this chapter:

(1) Registered mortgage loan originators, or any individual required to be registered while actively employed by a covered financial institution as defined in regulation G, 12 C.F.R. Part 1007.102;

(2) An attorney licensed in Washington who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney's representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of a lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;

(3) Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member; or

(4) Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan secured by a dwelling that served as the individual's residence.

[ 2015 c 229 s 32; 2012 c 17 s 6; 2009 c 120 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.